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DI3P3-01

DTC P0136/27 | Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction
(Bank 1 Sensor 2)

DTC P0156/29 | Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction
(Bank 2 Sensor 2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Refer to DTC P0130/21, P0150/28 (Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 1 Sensor1)
(Bank 2 Sensor 1)) on page DI-51.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Voltage output of the oxygen sensor (bank 1 sensor 2, bank 2
sensor 2) remains at 0.4 VV or more or 0.5 V or less when the
P0136/27 after the engine is warmed up and under conditions
P0156/29 (a) and (b):

(@) Vehicle speed: 100 km/h (62 mph)

(b) Engine speed: 1,500 rpm

* Oxygen sensor

HINT:
. Bank 1 referstobankthatincludescylinderNo. 1.
. Bank 2refersto bankthatdoes notinclude cylinder No. 1.

«  Sensor2referstothe sensorfartheraway fromthe engine body.

WIRING DIAGRAM

RefertoDTCPO 130/21, P 0150/28 (Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 1 Sensor1)
(Bank 2 Sensor 1)) on page DI-51 for the WIRING DIAGRAM.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

Whenusinghand -heldtester

HINT:

Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-

ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air -
fuelrafidlean orrich, efc. atthe time ofthe malfunction.

1 Arethere any other codes (besidesDTC PO 136 0or PO 156) being output?

YES> Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI-17).
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2 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
oxygen sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

3 Checkthe output voltage of oxygen sensor (bank 1,2sensor2).

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b)  After warming up the engine, race engine at 2,500 rpm for 3 min.
CHECK:
Read voltage output of oxygen sensor (bank 1 sensor 2, bank 2 sensor 2) when engine suddenly raced.
HINT:
Perform quick racing to 4,000 rpm 3 min. using accelerator pedal.
OK:
Oxygen sensor output voltage: Alternates from 0.4 V or less to 0.5 V or more.

connected.

0K> Check that each connector is properly

@

Replace oxygen sensor.

Whennotusinghand -heldtester

1 Arethere any other codes (besides code 27 or 29) being output?

YES> Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI-17).

@

Replace oxygen sensor.
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